Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-1,112
Insolvent banks; director; payment of dividends.

At any time after the expiration of the date fixed for the presentation of claims, the district court may by order, upon the application of the director, authorize the director to declare out of the funds remaining in his or her hands, after the payment of expenses, one or more distributions, and at the earliest possible date the director shall declare a final distribution as may be directed by the district court of the county in which the main office of such bank is located.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 69, p. 170;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,133;

R.S.1943, § 8-198;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 112, p. 181;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 109.

This section does not constitute an unlawful delegation of judicial power to an executive department of government. Department of Banking v. Hedges, 136 Neb. 382, 286 N.W. 277 (1939).